Illinois, session 104th, SB912.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 5amended by changing Section 101 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 570/101)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1101)7    Sec. 101. This Act shall be known as and and may be cited 8as the "Illinois Controlled Substances Act."9(Source: P.A. 77-757.)